es: Tema conmemorativo: Aniversario; Organización benéfica/causa; Coronación/inauguración; Patrimonio cultural; Persona famosa; Evento histórico; Días festivos/festivales; Lugar de interés/monumento; Monumento militar/de guerra; Símbolo nacional; Presidente/líder; Religioso; Realeza/monarquía; Espacio/ciencia; Evento deportivo; Transporte/ingeniería; Vida silvestre/naturaleza; Exposición mundial/feria; Otro
pt-BR: Tema comemorativo: Aniversário; Caridade/Causa; Coroação/Posse; Patrimônio cultural; Pessoa famosa; Evento histórico; Feriados/Festivais; Ponto de referência/Monumento; Memorial militar/de guerra; Símbolo nacional; Presidente/Líder; Religioso; Realeza/Monarquia; Espaço/Ciência; Evento esportivo; Transporte/Engenharia; Vida selvagem/Natureza; Exposição universal/feira; Outro
ko: 기념 대상: 기념일; 자선/대의; 대관식/취임식; 문화 유산; 유명인; 역사적 사건; 휴일/축제; 랜드마크/기념물; 군사/전쟁 기념관; 국가 상징; 대통령/지도자; 종교; 왕족/군주제; 우주/과학; 스포츠 이벤트; 교통/엔지니어링; 야생동물/자연; 세계 박람회/페어; 기타
sk-SK: Pamätný predmet: Výročie; Charita/účel; Korunovácia/inaugurácia; Kultúrne dedičstvo; Slávna osobnosť; Historická udalosť; Sviatky/festivaly; Pamiatka/monument; Vojenský/vojnový pamätník; Národný symbol; Prezident/líder; Náboženstvo; Kráľovská rodina/monarchia; Vesmír/veda; Športová udalosť; Doprava/strojárstvo; Zvieratá/príroda; Svetová výstava/veľtrh; Iné
pl: Temat upamiętnienia: Rocznica; Organizacja charytatywna / sprawa społeczna; Koronacja / inauguracja; Dziedzictwo kulturowe; Sławna osoba; Wydarzenie historyczne; Święta / festiwale; Zabytek / pomnik; Militaria / pomnik wojenny; Symbol narodowy; Prezydent / przywódca; Religijny; Rodzina królewska / monarchia; Kosmos / nauka; Wydarzenie sportowe; Transport / inżynieria; Dzikie zwierzęta / natura; Wystawa światowa / targi; Inny
ro-RO: Subiect comemorativ: Aniversare; Caritate/Cauză; Încoronare/Inaugurare; Patrimoniu cultural; Persoană celebră; Eveniment istoric; Sărbători/Festivaluri; Reper/Monument; Memorial militar/de război; Simbol național; Președinte/Lider; Religios; Regalitate/Monarhie; Spațiu/Știință; Eveniment sportiv; Transport/Inginerie; Faună/Natură; Expoziție mondială/târg; Altele
vi: Chủ đề kỷ niệm: Lễ kỷ niệm; Từ thiện/Sứ mệnh; Lễ đăng quang/nhậm chức; Di sản văn hóa; Người nổi tiếng; Sự kiện lịch sử; Ngày lễ/lễ hội; Địa danh/đài kỷ niệm; Quân đội/đài tưởng niệm chiến tranh; Biểu tượng quốc gia; Tổng thống/nhà lãnh đạo; Tôn giáo; Hoàng gia/chế độ quân chủ; Không gian/khoa học; Sự kiện thể thao; Giao thông/kỹ thuật; Động vật hoang dã/thiên nhiên; Hội chợ/triển lãm thế giới; Khác
lt-LT: Proginis objektas: Metinės; Labdara / tikslas; Karūnavimas / inauguracija; Kultūros paveldas; Įžymi asmenybė; Istorinis įvykis; Šventės / festivaliai; Lankytinas objektas / paminklas; Karybos / karo memorialas; Nacionalinis simbolis; Prezidentas / lyderis; Religija; Karališkoji šeima / monarchija; Kosmosas / mokslas; Sporto renginys; Transportas / inžinerija; Laukinė gamta; Pasaulinė paroda / mugė; Kita
cs: Námět pamětní mince: Výročí; Charita / dobrá věc; Korunovace/Inaugurace; Kulturní dědictví; Slavná osobnost; Historická událost; Svátky/Festivaly; Památka/Monument; Vojenský / válečný památník; Národní symbol; Prezident / státník; Náboženské; Královská rodina / monarchie; Vesmír/Věda; Sportovní událost; Doprava/Technika; Divoká zvěř / příroda; Světová výstava / veletrh; Ostatní
de: Gedenkmotiv: Jubiläum; Wohltätigkeit/Guter Zweck; Krönung/Amtseinführung; Kulturelles Erbe; Berühmte Persönlichkeit; Historisches Ereignis; Feiertage/Feste; Wahrzeichen/Denkmal; Militär/Kriegerdenkmal; Nationales Symbol; Präsident:in/Staatsoberhaupt; Religiös; Königshaus/Monarchie; Weltraum/Wissenschaft; Sportereignis; Verkehr/Ingenieurwesen; Tierwelt/Natur; Weltausstellung/Messe; Sonstige
hu: Emléktárgy: Évforduló; Jótékonyság / ügy; Koronázás / beiktatás; Kulturális örökség; Híres személy; Történelmi esemény; Ünnepek / fesztiválok; Nevezetesség / emlékmű; Katonai / háborús emlékmű; Nemzeti szimbólum; Elnök / vezető; Vallási; Királyság / monarchia; Űrkutatás / tudomány; Sportesemény; Közlekedés / mérnöki tudomány; Vadvilág / természet; Világkiállítás / vásár; Egyéb
sl-SI: Spominski predmet: Obletnica; Dobrodelnost/namen; Kronanje/inavguracija; Kulturna dediščina; Znana osebnost; Zgodovinski dogodek; Prazniki/festivali; Znamenitost/spomenik; Vojska/vojni spomenik; Nacionalni simbol; Predsednik/voditelj; Versko; Kraljevina/monarhija; Vesolje/znanost; Športni dogodek; Promet/inženiring; Prostoživeče živali/narava; Svetovna razstava/sejem; Drugo
fr: Sujet commémoratif: Anniversaire; Organisme de bienfaisance/cause; Couronnement/inauguration; Héritage culturel; Personne célèbre; Événement historique; Fêtes/Festivals; Lieu emblématique/Monument; Monument aux morts/militaire; Symbole national; Président/Dirigeant; Religieux; Royauté/Monarchie; Espace/Science; Événement sportif; Transport/Ingénierie; Faune/Nature; Exposition universelle/Foire; Autre
th: หัวข้อที่ใช้ในการรำลึก: วันครบรอบ; การกุศล/องค์กร; พระราชพิธีบรมราชาภิเษก/พิธีสาบานตนเข้ารับตำแหน่ง; มรดกทางวัฒนธรรม; บุคคลที่มีชื่อเสียง; เหตุการณ์ทางประวัติศาสตร์; วันหยุด/เทศกาล; สถานที่สำคัญ/อนุสาวรีย์; อนุสรณ์สถานทางทหาร/สงคราม; สัญลักษณ์ประจำชาติ; ประธานาธิบดี/ผู้นำ; ศาสนา; ราชวงศ์/พระมหากษัตริย์; อวกาศ/วิทยาศาสตร์; การแข่งขันกีฬา; การคมนาคม/วิศวกรรม; สัตว์ป่า/ธรรมชาติ; งานแสดงสินค้าระดับโลก; อื่นๆ
ja: 記念対象: 記念日; 慈善活動/大義; 戴冠/就任; 文化遺産; 著名人; 歴史的出来事; 休日/祭り; ランドマーク/記念碑; 軍事/戦争記念碑; 国家の象徴; 大統領/指導者; 宗教; 王室/君主制; 宇宙/科学; スポーツイベント; 交通/工学; 野生動物/自然; 万国博覧会/フェア; その他
nl: Herdenking onderwerp: Jubileum; Goed doel/initiatief; Kroning/inauguratie; Cultureel erfgoed; Beroemd persoon; Historische gebeurtenis; Feestdagen/festivals; Bezienswaardigheid/monument; Militair/oorlogsmonument; Nationaal symbool; President/leider; Religieus; Koningshuis/monarchie; Ruimte/wetenschap; Sportevenement; Vervoer/techniek; Dieren/natuur; Wereldtentoonstelling/beurs; Overige
da: Erindringsmotiv: Jubilæum; Velgørenhed/sag; Kroning/indsættelse; Kulturarv; Kendt person; Historisk begivenhed; Helligdage/festivaler; Vartegn/monument; Militær/krigsmindesmærke; Nationalt symbol; Præsident/leder; Religiøs; Kongelige/monarki; Rumfart/videnskab; Sportsbegivenhed; Transport/teknik; Dyreliv/natur; Verdensudstilling/messe; Andet
fi: Juhlarahan aihe: Vuosipäivä; Hyväntekeväisyys/aate; Kruunajaiset/virkaanastujaiset; Kulttuuriperintö; Kuuluisa henkilö; Historiallinen tapahtuma; Lomat/festivaalit; Maamerkki/monumentti; Sotilaallinen/sotamuistomerkki; Kansallinen symboli; Presidentti/johtaja; Uskonnollinen; Kuninkaalliset/monarkia; Avaruus/tiede; Urheilutapahtuma; Liikenne/tekniikka; Villieläimet/luonto; Maailmannäyttely/messut; Muu
nb: Minneemne: Jubileum; Veldedighet/sak; Kroning/innsettelse; Kulturarv; Kjent person; Historisk hendelse; Høytider/festivaler; Landemerke/monument; Militær/krigsminnesmerke; Nasjonalsymbol; President/leder; Religiøst; Kongelige/monarki; Romfart/vitenskap; Sportsarrangement; Transport/ingeniørkunst; Dyreliv/natur; Verdensutstilling; Annet
bg-BG: Тема на възпоменателната монета: Годишнина; Благотворителност/казуа; Коронация/Встъпване в длъжност; Културно наследство; Известна личност; Историческо събитие; Празници/Фестивали; Забележителност/Паметник; Военен паметник; Национален символ; Президент/Лидер; Религия; Кралско семейство/Монархия; Космос/Наука; Спортно събитие; Транспорт/Инженерство; Дива природа/Природа; Световно изложение/панаир; Друго
sv: Jubileumsämne: Jubileum; Välgörenhet/ändamål; Kröning/inauguration; Kulturarv; Känd person; Historisk händelse; Helgdagar/festivaler; Landmärke/monument; Militär/krigsminnesmärke; Nationalsymbol; President/ledare; Religiös; Kunglighet/monarki; Rymd/vetenskap; Sportevenemang; Transport/teknik; Djurliv/natur; Världsutställning/-mässa; Övrigt
pt-PT: Entidade comemorativa: Aniversário; Caridade/causa; Coroação/inauguração; Património cultural; Pessoa famosa; Evento histórico; Feriados/festivais; Ponto de referência/monumento; Militar/memorial de guerra; Símbolo nacional; Presidente/líder; Religioso; Realeza/monarquia; Espaço/ciência; Evento desportivo; Transporte/engenharia; Vida selvagem/natureza; Exposição mundial/feira; Outro
hr-HR: Komemorativni predmet: Godišnjica; Dobrotvorna udruga / cilj; Krunidba/Inauguracija; Kulturna baština; Poznata osoba; Povijesni događaj; Blagdani/Festivali; Znamenitost/Spomenik; Vojska / ratni spomenik; Nacionalni simbol; Predsjednik/Vođa; Vjersko; Kraljevska obitelj / monarhija; Svemir/Znanost; Sportski događaj; Prijevoz/Inženjerstvo; Divlje životinje / priroda; Svjetska izložba / sajam; Ostalo
zh-TW: 紀念主題: 週年紀念; 慈善/公益; 加冕/就職; 文化遺產; 名人; 歷史事件; 假日/節慶; 地標/紀念碑; 軍事/戰爭紀念碑; 國家象徵; 總統/領袖; 宗教; 皇室/君主; 太空/科學; 體育賽事; 交通/工程; 野生動物/自然; 世界博覽會; 其他
it: soggetto commemorativo: Anniversario; Beneficenza/Causa; Incoronazione/Inaugurazione; Patrimonio culturale; Personaggio famoso; Evento storico; Feste/Festival; Punto di riferimento/Monumento; Forze armate/Memoriale di guerra; Simbolo nazionale; Presidente/Leader; Religioso; Reali/Monarchia; Spazio/Scienza; Evento sportivo; Trasporti/Ingegneria; Fauna selvatica/Natura; Esposizione universale/Fiera; Altro
en: Commemorative subject: Anniversary; Charity/Cause; Coronation/Inauguration; Cultural heritage; Famous person; Historical event; Holidays/Festivals; Landmark/Monument; Military/War memorial; National symbol; President/Leader; Religious; Royalty/Monarchy; Space/Science; Sports event; Transportation/Engineering; Wildlife/Nature; World exposition/fair; Other
zh-CN: 纪念主题: 周年纪念; 慈善/公益; 加冕/就职; 文化遗产; 名人; 历史事件; 假日/节日; 地标/纪念碑; 军事/战争纪念; 国家象征; 总统/领导人; 宗教; 皇室/君主制; 太空/科学; 体育赛事; 交通/工程; 野生动植物/自然; 世界博览会/展会; 其他
ru: Тема памятной монеты: Юбилей; Благотворительность/Социальная инициатива; Коронация/Инаугурация; Культурное наследие; Известная личность; Историческое событие; Праздники/Фестивали; Достопримечательность/Памятник; Военный/Военный мемориал; Национальный символ; Президент/Лидер; Религия; Королевская семья/Монархия; Космос/Наука; Спортивное событие; Транспорт/Инженерия; Дикая природа/Природа; Всемирная выставка/ярмарка; Другое
el: Επετειακό/μνημονικό θέμα: Επέτειος; Φιλανθρωπία/Σκοπός; Στέψη/Ορκωμοσία; Πολιτιστική κληρονομιά; Διάσημο πρόσωπο; Ιστορικό γεγονός; Γιορτές/Φεστιβάλ; Ορόσημο/Μνημείο; Στρατιωτικό/Πολεμικό μνημείο; Εθνικό σύμβολο; Πρόεδρος/Ηγέτης; Θρησκευτικό; Βασιλεία/Μοναρχία; Διάστημα/Επιστήμη; Αθλητικό γεγονός; Μεταφορές/Μηχανική; Άγρια ζωή/Φύση; Παγκόσμια έκθεση; Άλλο
tr: Hatıra konusu: Yıl dönümü; Hayır/Amaç; Taç giyme töreni/Göreve başlama; Kültürel miras; Ünlü kişi; Tarihi olay; Bayramlar/Festivaller; Simgesel yapı/Anıt; Askeri/Savaş anıtı; Ulusal sembol; Başkan/Lider; Dini; Kraliyet/Monarşi; Uzay/Bilim; Spor etkinliği; Ulaşım/Mühendislik; Yaban hayatı/Doğa; Dünya fuarı/sergisi; Diğer